Washington statutes.
RCW 36.87.010

Resolution of intention to vacate.

When a county road or any part thereof is considered useless, the board by resolution entered upon its minutes, may declare its intention to vacate and abandon the same or any portion thereof and shall direct the county road engineer to report upon such vacation and abandonment.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 185 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.87.010. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 48; RRS s 6450-48.]